Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 37.1 Sexual Offender Registration and Community Notification

11-37.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and be cited as the “Sexual Offender Registration and Community Notification Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1.

11-37.1-2.
Definitions.

“Abscond” means to not register as required, or to relocate to some unknown place other than the registered place of residence, or to conceal himself or herself in an attempt to avoid registration or verification of registration.

“Aggravated offense” means, and includes, offenses involving sexual penetration of victims of any age through the use of force, or the threat of use of force, or offenses involving sexual penetration of victims who are fourteen (14) years of age or under.

“Board,” “board of review,” or “sex offender board of review” means the sex offender board of review appointed by the governor pursuant to §

11-37.1-6

.

“Conviction” or “convicted” means, and includes, any instance where:

A judgment of conviction has been entered against any person for any offense specified in subsection (f) or (v), or a federal offense, a foreign offense, or a military offense, regardless of whether an appeal is pending; or

There has been a finding of guilty for any offense specified in subsection (f) or (v), or a federal offense, a foreign offense, or a military offense, regardless of whether an appeal is pending; or

There has been a plea of guilty or nolo contendere for any offense specified in subsection (f) or (v), or a federal offense, a foreign offense, or a military offense, regardless of whether an appeal is pending; or

There has been an admission of sufficient facts or a finding of delinquency for any offense specified in subsection (f) or (v), or a federal offense, a foreign offense, or a military offense, regardless of whether or not an appeal is pending.

Provided, in the event that a conviction, as defined in this subsection, has been overturned, reversed, or otherwise vacated, the person who was the subject of the conviction shall no longer be required to register as required by this chapter and any records of a registration shall be destroyed. Provided, further, that nothing in this section shall be construed to eliminate a registration requirement of a person who is again convicted of an offense for which registration is required by this chapter.

[Deleted by P.L. 2003, ch. 162, § 1 and by P.L. 2003, ch. 170, § 1].

“Criminal offense against a victim who is a minor” means, and includes, any of the following offenses or any offense in another jurisdiction that is substantially the equivalent of the following or for which the person is or would be required to register under 34 U.S.C. § 20911 as amended:

Kidnapping or false imprisonment of a minor, in violation of §§

11-26-1

.4,

11-26-1

or

11-26-2

, where the victim of the offense is sixteen (16) years of age or older and under the age of eighteen (18) years;

Enticement of a child in violation of §

11-26-1.5

with the intent to violate §§

11-37-6

,

11-37-8

,

11-37-8

.1,

11-37-8.3

;

Any violation of §§

11-37-6

, 11-37-8,

11-37-8.1

, or

11-37-8.3

;

Any violation of §

11-1-10

, where the underlying offense is a violation of chapter 34 of this title and the victim, or person solicited to commit the offense, is under the age of eighteen (18) years;

Any violation of §

11-9-1(b)

or (c);

Any violation of §

11-9-1.3

;

Any violation of §

11-9-1.5

;

[Deleted by P.L. 2018, ch. 157, § 1 and by P.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1].

Any violation of §

11-37-8.8

;

Any violation of §

11-64-2

, where the victim is under the age of eighteen (18) years;

Murder in violation of §

11-23-1

, where the murder was committed in the perpetration of, or attempted perpetration of, kidnapping and where the victim of the offense is under eighteen (18) years of age;

Any violation of §§

11-67-6

,

11-67.1-3(b)

,

11-67.1-4(b)

,

11-67.1-5(c)

,

11-67.1-6(b)

, or

11-67.1-7(b)

; or

Any conviction for an attempt or conspiracy to commit an offense enumerated in this subsection.

“Designated state law enforcement agency” means the attorney general, or his or her designee.

“Employed, carries on a vocation” means and includes the definition of “employed, carries on a vocation” under 34 U.S.C. § 20911.

“Federal offense” means, and includes, any conviction for an offense that was obtained under federal law which, if committed within the jurisdiction of this state, would require the person to register, any conviction for an offense under 34 U.S.C. § 20911 as amended, or any conviction for an attempt or conspiracy to commit an offense requiring registration under this subsection.

“Foreign offense” means, and includes, any conviction for an offense which, if committed within the jurisdiction of this state, would require the person to register that was obtained under the laws of Canada, the United Kingdom, Australia, New Zealand, or under the laws of any foreign country when the United States state department in its country reports on human rights practices has concluded that an independent judiciary generally or vigorously enforced the right to a fair trial in that country during the year in which the conviction occurred, or any conviction for an attempt or conspiracy to commit an offense enumerated in this subsection.

“Habitually lives or sleeps” means living in a place with some regularity, and with reference to where a person required to be registered under this chapter actually lives, which could be some place other than a mailing address or primary address but would entail a place where the person lives on an intermittent basis regardless of whether it pertains to a location otherwise identifiable by street or address.

“Homeless” means a person required to be registered under this chapter who lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence; has a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings, including a car, park, abandoned building, bus or train station, airport, or camping ground; living in a supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designated to provide temporary living arrangements (including hotels and motels paid for by federal, state, or local government programs for low-income individuals or by charitable organizations, congregate shelters, and transitional housing); or who resided in a shelter or place not meant for human habitation and who is exiting an institution where he or she temporarily resided.

“Immediate” or “Immediately” means upon receipt of information provided by or regarding a person required to register under this chapter but not later than three (3) business days.

“Institutions of higher education” means any university, two- or four-year (2 or 4) college or community college.

“Jurisdiction” means any of the fifty (50) states, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, the United States Virgin Islands, and any Indian tribe that has elected to function as a registration and notification jurisdiction pursuant to 34 U.S.C. § 20929.

“Mental abnormality” means a congenital or acquired condition of a person that affects the emotional or volitional capacity of the person in a manner that predisposes that person to the commission of criminal sexual acts to a degree that makes the person a menace to the health and safety of other persons.

“Military offense” means, and includes, any conviction for any military offense specified by the secretary of defense under § 115(a)(8)(C)(i) of Pub. L. 105-119, codified at 10 U.S.C. § 951 note, or any conviction for an attempt or conspiracy to commit an offense enumerated in this subsection.

“Parole board” means the parole board or its designee.

“Predator” means a person whose act(s) is (are) or was (were) directed at a stranger, or at a person with whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the primary purpose of victimization.

“Public or private educational institution” means early childhood facilities (nursery school, pre-kindergarten and kindergarten), elementary, middle, secondary, institutions of higher education, and postsecondary educational institutions authorized or licensed by the State of Rhode Island.

“School” means the buildings and real property of kindergarten, elementary, middle, and secondary institutions, whether public or private.

“Sexually violent offense” means, and includes, any violation of §§

11-37-2

,

11-37-4

,

11-37-6

,

11-37-8

,

11-37-8

.1,

11-37-8.3

, 11-67-2 (where the victim was subject to commercial sexual activity), 11-67-3(a), 11-67-3(b) (where the victim was subject to commercial sexual activity), 11-67.1-3(c) (where the victim was subject to sexual servitude),

11-67.1-5(d)

,

11-67.1-6(c)

; or

11-5-1

, where the specified felony is sexual assault; or §

11-23-1

, where the murder was committed in the perpetration of, or attempted perpetration of, rape or any degree of sexual assault or child molestation; or any offense in another jurisdiction that is substantially the equivalent of any offense listed in this subsection or for which the person is or would be required to register under 34 U.S.C. § 20911 as amended, or any conviction for an attempt or conspiracy to commit an offense enumerated in this subsection.

“Sexually violent predator” means a person who has been convicted of a sexually violent offense and who has a mental abnormality or personality disorder that makes the person likely to engage in predatory sexually violent offenses.

“Student” means, and includes, the definition of “student” under 34 U.S.C. § 20911.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 14; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 14; P.L. 1999, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 330, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1.

11-37.1-3.
Registration required — Persons covered.

Any person who, in this or any other jurisdiction: (1) has been convicted of a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor, (2) has been convicted of a sexually violent offense, (3) has been determined to be a sexually violent predator, (4) has committed an aggravated offense as defined in §

11-37.1-2

, (5) is a recidivist, as defined in §

11-37.1-4

, (6) has been convicted of a federal offense, (7) has been convicted of a foreign offense, (8) has been convicted of a military offense, or (9) has been convicted of a violation of §

11-37.1-10

shall be required to register his or her current address with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city or town in which the person having the duty to register resides for the time period specified in §

11-37.1-4

.

Any person who is: (1) a nonresident worker who has committed an offense that is subject to registration in the jurisdiction of his or her residence and who is employed or carrying on a vocation in Rhode Island as defined in §

11-37.1-2(h)

, or (2) a nonresident student as defined by §

11-37.1-2(x)

who has committed an offense that is subject to registration in the jurisdiction of his or her residence and who is attending a public or private educational institution in Rhode Island, shall be required to register his or her current address and the address of his or her place of employment or a public or private educational institution attended with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city or town in which the nonresident worker or student is employed or attending a public or private educational institution.

Any person having a duty to register as a sex offender in subsection (a) of this section who is enrolled at, employed at, or carrying on a vocation at an institution of higher education shall have an additional duty to register the information described in subsection (a) of this section with the local law enforcement agency in the city or town where the primary campus of the institution of higher education at which the person is enrolled, employed, or carrying on a vocation is located for the period of time they are enrolled at, employed at or carrying on a vocation at the institution of higher education.

If a person is registered as a sex offender in another jurisdiction for an offense which, if committed within the jurisdiction of this state, would require the person to register as a sex offender, then that person, upon moving to or returning to this state, shall register as a sex offender in the same manner as if the offense were committed within Rhode Island.

Registration information. In addition to the requirements of subsections (a) through (d) of this section, the person required to register under this section shall provide the local law enforcement agency the following information:

Relating to the person’s name:

The person’s full primary given or legal name;

Any and all names the person has used in the past, valid or otherwise; and

Any and all nicknames, aliases, and pseudonyms regardless of the context in which they are used.

Relating to the person’s date of birth:

The person’s actual date of birth; and

Any other date of birth used by the person.

Relating to the person’s social security number:

A valid social security number for the person; and

Any social security number the person has used in the past, valid or otherwise.

A current digitized photograph of the person.

An accurate description of the person as follows:

A general description of the person’s physical appearance or characteristics; and

Any identifying marks, such as, but not limited to, scars, moles, birthmarks, or tattoos.

A photocopy of all of the person’s valid driver’s licenses issued by any jurisdiction.

A photocopy of all of the identification cards issued to the person.

A photocopy of any passports issued to the person.

Relating to the person’s residence:

The address of each residence at which the person resides or will reside;

Any location or description that identifies where the person habitually lives or sleeps regardless of whether it pertains to a permanent residence or location otherwise identifiable by a street or address; and

Whether the person is homeless.

Any and all telephone numbers of the person.

Relating to the person’s internet-related activity:

Any and all email addresses used by the person;

Any and all instant message addresses and identifiers;

Any and all other designations or monitors used for self-identification in internet communications or postings; and

Any and all designations used by the person for the purpose of routing or self-identification and internet communications or postings.

Relating to all vehicles owned or operated by the person for work or personal use including land vehicles, aircraft, and watercraft:

License plate numbers;

Registration numbers or identifiers;

General description of the vehicle to include color, make, model, and year; and

Any permanent or frequent location where any covered vehicle is kept.

Relating to the person’s employment, any and all places where the person is employed in any means including volunteer and unpaid positions:

The name of the person’s employer;

The address of the person’s employer; and

Similar information related to any transient or day labor employment.

All licensing information that authorizes the person to engage in an occupation or carry out a trade or business.

Relating to the person’s public or private educational institution:

The name of each public or private educational institution at which the person is or will be a student; and

The address of each public or private educational institution where the person is or will be a student.

Relating to the person’s criminal history:

The date of all arrests;

The date of all convictions;

The person’s status of parole, probation, or supervised release;

The person’s registration status; and

Any outstanding arrest warrants.

The fingerprints and palm prints of the person in a digitized format that shall be submitted to the FBI Central Database, Next Generation Identification Program.

If the person’s DNA is not already contained in the Combined DNA Index System (CODIS), the person shall provide a sample of his or her DNA. Any DNA sample obtained from a person shall be submitted to an appropriate lab for analysis and entry of the resulting DNA profile into CODIS.

The text of each provision of law defining the criminal offense(s) for which the person is registered.

When the person will be absent from his/her residence for seven (7) days or more:

Identifying information of the temporary lodging locations including addresses and names; and

The dates the person will be staying at each temporary lodging location.

If the person will be traveling outside of the United States, the person must notify the local law enforcement agency at least twenty-one (21) days in advance of the travel date and provide any necessary information regarding his or her international travel in accordance with §

11-37.1-9(g)

.

A signed copy of the person’s notice of registration and notification obligations as provided in §

11-37.1-5(b)(6)

.

The local law enforcement agency and the designated state law enforcement agency shall maintain all information obtained under this chapter in a digitized format.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 330, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 7; P.L. 2006, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1.

11-37.1-4.
Duration of registration — Frequency of registration.

Annual registration. Any person required to register under § 11-37.1-3(a)(1) or (2) shall annually register with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city or town in which the person having the duty to register resides for a period of ten (10) years from the expiration of sentence for the offense and shall verify his or her address with the agency on a quarterly basis for the first two (2) years of the period unless the person has been determined to be a sexually violent predator in accordance with §

11-37.1-6

or unless the person is required to register for the life of that person in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section.

Sexually violent predators. Any person who has been determined to be a sexually violent predator in accordance with the provisions of §

11-37.1-6

shall be required to annually register in person with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city or town in which the person having the duty to register resides for the life of that person and to verify his or her address on a quarterly basis for the life of that person.

Recidivists and aggravated crime offenders. Any person required to register under §

11-37.1-3

and who has one or more prior convictions for any offense described in §

11-37.1-2

or has been convicted of an aggravated offense as defined in §

11-37.1-2

shall annually register in person with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city or town in which the person having the duty to register resides for the life of that person and to verify his or her address on a quarterly basis for the life of that person.

Nonresident workers and students. Any nonresident person required to register pursuant to § 11-37.1-3(b)(1) or (2) shall annually register in person with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city or town in which the person having the duty to register is employed or attends a public or private educational institution for the period of time that the person is employed in Rhode Island or is attending a public or private educational institution in Rhode Island.

Initial registration; Incarcerated individuals. All persons required to register under this chapter who are sentenced to a period of confinement shall perform their initial registration by appearing in person at the local law enforcement agency in the city or town in which the person intends to reside within twenty-four (24) hours of their release from confinement.

Initial registration; Non-incarcerated individuals. All persons required to register under this chapter who are convicted in Rhode Island and who are not sentenced to serve a term of incarceration or confinement shall perform their initial registration by appearing in person at the local law enforcement agency in the city or town in which the person intends to reside within twenty-four (24) hours of being sentenced.

Initial registration; Individuals relocating to Rhode Island. All persons required to register under this chapter who are moving their residence to Rhode Island from another jurisdiction shall perform their initial registration by appearing in person at the local law enforcement agency in the city or town in which the person intends to reside within twenty-four (24) hours of their arrival in Rhode Island.

Initial registration; Nonresident workers and students. All nonresident workers or students who are required to register under this chapter shall perform their initial registration by appearing in person at the local law enforcement agency in the city or town in which the person is employed or is attending a public or private educational institution within twenty-four (24) hours of their first day of their personal attendance at their place of employment or a public or private educational institution.

Tolling provision. Where, during the period in which any person is required to register, a person required to register under this chapter is incarcerated or re-incarcerated for any offense or is civilly committed, the person’s registration requirements shall be tolled during the subsequent incarceration, re-incarceration or commitment.

Juveniles. Any juvenile having the duty to register under subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall be required to annually register in person with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city or town in which the juvenile having the duty to register resides for fifteen (15) years subsequent to the date of release from confinement or placement in the community or probation for such offense or offenses and to verify his or her address on a quarterly basis for said fifteen (15) years. However, if a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent under §

11-37-8.1

or

11-37-8.3

, the court shall assess the totality of the circumstances of the offense and if the court makes a finding that the conduct of the parties is criminal only because of the age of the victim, the court may have discretion to order the juvenile to register as a sex offender as long as the court deems it appropriate to protect the community and to rehabilitate the juvenile offender. Registration shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

Annual registration for federal, foreign, or military offenses. Any person who is required to register under this chapter due to a conviction of a federal offense, a foreign offense, or a military offense shall register for the duration and frequency in the same manner as if the offense were committed within Rhode Island.

Homeless persons. In addition to the other requirements of this section, a person who is required to register under this chapter and is homeless shall verify their presence in the community with the local law enforcement agency where they are required to register three (3) times a week for the duration of their being homeless.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 462, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1.

11-37.1-5.
Registration requirement upon release, parole, or probation.

Duty of state officials. If a person who is required to register under this chapter is released from prison, including those placed on parole, then the official in charge of the place of confinement or his or her designee shall comply with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section;

[Deleted by P.L. 2018, ch. 157, § 1 and P.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1.]

If a person who is required to register under this chapter is released on probation or placed on home confinement, then the assistant administrator or the division of probation shall comply with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section;

If a person who is required to register under this chapter is released from a juvenile correctional facility, either outright or on some form of supervised release, then the person in charge of the institution shall comply with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section;

If a person who is required to register under this chapter is placed on juvenile probation, then the person in charge of the program shall comply with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section; or

If a person who is required to register under this chapter has moved into this state under the provisions of an interstate compact providing for supervision of the terms of his or her release by agents of this state, then the administrator of the interstate compact shall comply with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section.

Notification of registration requirements. The person designated with the responsibility for the notification requirements of this chapter shall, prior to the release of any person required to register under this chapter:

Inform the person of the duty to register and obtain the information required for registration under subsection (c) of this section;

Inform the person that if the person changes his or her residence address, the person shall give the new address to the designated state law enforcement agency in writing within twenty-four (24) hours;

Inform the person that if the person changes residence to another jurisdiction, the person shall register the new address with the law enforcement agency with whom the person last registered, and the person is also required to register with a designated law enforcement agency in the new jurisdiction in accordance with the new jurisdiction’s sex offender registration statute;

Inform the person that if the person works or attends a public or private educational institution in another jurisdiction in which he or she does not reside, the person shall register his or her employment address or address of the educational institution he or she attends as required by the other jurisdiction;

Obtain fingerprints and a photograph of the person if these have not already been obtained in connection with the offense that triggers registration; and

Require the person to read and sign a form approved by the attorney general stating that the duty of the person to register under this section has been explained.

Registration information. In addition to the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, for a person required to register under §

11-37.1-3

, then the person responsible for the notification required under subsection (b) of this section shall obtain the following information in a digitized format:

Relating to the person’s name:

The person’s full primary given or legal name;

Any and all names the person has used in the past, valid or otherwise; and

Any and all nicknames, aliases, and pseudonyms regardless of the context in which they are used.

Relating to the person’s date of birth:

The person’s actual date of birth; and

Any other date of birth used by the person.

Relating to the person’s social security number:

A valid social security number for the person; and

Any social security number the person has used in the past, valid or otherwise.

A current digitized photograph of the person.

An accurate description of the person as follows:

A general description of the person’s physical appearance or characteristics; and

Any identifying marks, such as, but not limited to, scars, moles, birthmarks, or tattoos.

Relating to the person’s residence:

The address of each residence at which the person resides or will reside; and

Whether the person is homeless.

Any and all telephone numbers of the person.

A signed copy of the person’s notice of registration and notification obligations as provided in subsection (b)(6).

For purposes of subsection (c) of this section, the provisions of chapter 37.3 of title 5 pertaining to healthcare privileges, the provisions of §

9-17-24

pertaining to the privilege of witnesses, or the provisions of §

42-72-8

pertaining to confidentiality of records of the department of children, youth and families, shall not be effective so as to prevent the transfer of information or the testimony of any person possessing any information required by this subsection. Any information so obtained may be transferred to the sex offender board of review and may be used by them in making a determination of whether or not the person is a sexually violent predator or in determining the level of notification under §

11-37.1-12

. The information may also be used by the sentencing court or by any court reviewing the level of notification determined by the sex offender board of review or reviewing any conviction or sentence which requires registration under this chapter. Provided, information so obtained shall not be admissible in any other judicial proceeding against the subject of the information except to determine a person’s status as a sexually violent predator or to determine or review the level of notification to the community which has been made by a court or the sex offender board of review. Provided, further, that this subsection shall not be applicable to any person for whom an appeal is pending for which a final judgment of conviction has not been entered, until the time that a final conviction has been entered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 35; P.L. 1999, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1.

11-37.1-6.
Community notification.

Sex Offender Board of Review. The governor shall appoint eight (8) persons including experts in the field of the behavior and treatment of sexual offenders by reason of training and experience, victim’s rights advocates, and law enforcement representatives to the sex offender board of review. At least one member of the sex offender board of review shall be a qualified child/adolescent sex offender treatment specialist. These persons shall serve at the pleasure of the governor or until their successor has been duly qualified and appointed.

Duties of the board. Upon passage of this legislation, the sex offender board of review will utilize a validated risk assessment instrument and other material approved by the parole board to determine the level of risk an offender poses to the community and to assist the sentencing court in determining if that person is a sexually violent predator. If the offender is a juvenile, the Department of Children, Youth and Families shall select and administer a risk instrument appropriate for juveniles and shall submit the results to the sex offender board of review.

Duties of other state agencies. Six (6) months prior to release of any person having a duty to register under §

11-37.1-3

, or upon sentencing of a person having a duty to register under §

11-37.1-3

, if the offender is not incarcerated, the agency having supervisory responsibility and the Interstate Compact Unit of the Rhode Island department of corrections upon acceptance of supervision of a sexual offender from the sending jurisdiction shall refer the person to the sex offender board of review, together with any reports and documentation that may be helpful to the board, for a determination as to the level of risk an offender poses to the community and to assist the sentencing court in determining if that person is a sexually violent predator.

The board shall within thirty (30) days of a referral of a person shall conduct the validated risk assessment, review other material provided by the agency having supervisory responsibility and assign a risk of re-offense level to the offender. In addition, the board may find that, based on the assessment score and other material, that the person may possess a mental abnormality or personality disorder that makes the person likely to engage in sexually violent predatory offenses. In these cases, the committee shall ask the parole board psychiatrist or if the offender is a juvenile, a DCYF psychiatrist to conduct a sex offender evaluation to determine if the offender possesses a mental abnormality or personality disorder that affects the emotional or volitional capacity of the person in a manner that predisposes that person to the commission of criminal sexual acts to a degree that makes the person a menace to the health and safety of other persons.

Upon receipt of a sex offender evaluation that suggests there is sufficient evidence and documentation to suggest that a person may be a sexually violent predator, the sex offender board of review shall forward a report to the attorney general for consideration by the court.

Upon receipt of a report from the attorney general, the court, after notice to the offender and his or her counsel, shall upon consideration of the report and other materials, make a determination as to whether or not a person is a sexually violent predator.

Effect of determination. In the event that a determination is made by the court that a person is a sexually violent predator, that person shall be required to register and verify his or her address in accordance with §§

11-37.1-3

,

11-37.1-4

and

11-37.1-8(b)

.

No cause of action or liability shall arise or exist against the committee or any member or agent of the board as a result of the failure of the board to make any findings required by this section within the time period specified by subsection (2) of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board shall have access to all relevant records and information in the possession of any state official or agency having a duty under §

11-37.1-5(a)(1)

through (6), relating to the juvenile and adult offenders under review by the board, including, but not limited to, police reports; prosecutor’s statements of probable cause, presentence investigations and reports, complete judgments and sentences, current classification referrals, juvenile and adult criminal history records, violation and disciplinary reports, all psychological evaluations and psychiatric evaluations, psychiatric hospital records, sex offender evaluations and treatment reports, substance abuse evaluations and treatment reports to the extent allowed by federal law. Records and information obtained by the board of review under this subsection shall remain confidential, provided that the board of review may disclose the records and information to the sentencing court in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Duties of the director of the department of corrections/director of the department of children, youth and families. Not less than sixty (60) days prior to release of any person subject to this chapter, the director of the department of corrections or, in the event the person is a juvenile, the director of the department of children, youth and families, or their respective designees, shall seek verification that the duties of the sex offender board of review and any other state agency have been fulfilled as specified in §

11-37.1-6

et seq. In the event that the director of the department of corrections or, in the event the person is a juvenile, the director of the department of children, youth and families, cannot obtain verification, he or she shall, no less than thirty (30) days prior to the release of a person subject to this chapter, file with the presiding judge of the superior court or, in the case of a juvenile, the chief judge of the family court, a petition in the nature of mandamus, seeking compliance with this chapter. The court shall promptly, but no less than ten (10) days from the filing of the petition, hold a hearing on the petition. The court may, in its discretion, enter any orders consistent with this chapter to compel compliance, however, the court may not delay the release of any person subject to this chapter for the failure of the sex offender board of review or any state agency to fulfill its obligations under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 206, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 207, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1.